West Virginia, session 2026, SB425.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. CRIMES AGAINST THE PERSON. §61-2-2. Penalty for murder of first degree. Murder of the first degree shall be punished by confinement in the penitentiary for life.  Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, a person imprisoned for a conviction under this section with a sentence of life with mercy is not eligible for parole prior to having served a minimum of 30 years of his or her sentence.